Maryland, session 2025, HB0461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–201.
(b) Except for UNCUT AND LIVING flowers, sod, decorative trees and shrubs, and
any other product that usually is sold by a nursery or horticulturist, the sales and use tax
does not apply to a sale of an agricultural product by a farmer.
(C) THE SALES AND USE TAX DOES NOT APPLY TO THE SALE OF CUT
FLOWERS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0461*

HOUSE BILL 461
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.